Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.846] STATE-MANAGED MEDICATION STOCKPILING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin In order to manage the impacts from drug shortages and public health emergencies, the state requires a stockpile of essential medications to ensure emergency preparedness, address drug shortages, ensure ethical distribution of medication, ensure public safety, and manage supply chain disruptions. The state shall proactively protect patient access to medications by establishing medication reserves. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Essential medications" means prescription and over-the-counter drugs deemed necessary for public health. new text end new text begin (c) "Stockpiling" means the accumulation of medication beyond reasonable personal or institutional necessity. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Authorization. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Health, in collaboration with the Department of Commerce, shall create and manage a strategic stockpile of essential prescription medications. The commissioner of health shall collaborate with medical experts, pharmaceutical companies, and community health clinics to determine the scope of the stockpile needed. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Health may contract with third-party vendors to manage stockpiled inventory. The third-party vendors must have expertise in warehouse design; implementation of a stockpile; and management of medication tracking, inventory replenishment, distribution, and inventory rotation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Implementation. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Health shall develop protocols and guidelines for inventory tracking, storage conditions, equitable medication distribution, formulary development, and periodic reviews to ensure the safety and efficacy of stockpiled medications. new text end new text begin (b) The department shall develop protocols for the equitable distribution of stockpiled medications during emergencies. Distribution limits may be imposed during declared emergencies to ensure fair access. new text end new text begin (c) The department shall maintain a comprehensive inventory of medications within the stockpile and develop distribution protocols to ensure the distribution of medications and shall coordinate with local health authorities, emergency responders, and health care facilities. new text end new text begin (d) The department shall enter into agreements with pharmacies, hospitals, and manufacturers to facilitate the procurement and storage of essential medications. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting and oversight. new text end new text begin The department shall submit an annual report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health policy and finance. The report must detail the stockpile inventory, usage, and any updates to management protocols. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the purposes of section 1. new text end